Illinois, session 104th, HB492.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Redistricting Transparency and Public 5Participation Act is amended by changing Section 10-1 as 6follows: 7    (10 ILCS 125/10-1)8    Sec. 10-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 9the Redistricting Transparency and Public Participation Act. 10All references in this Article to "this Act" mean this 11Article.12(Source: P.A. 96-1541, eff. 3-7-11.)